California statutes. Insurance Code
Nothing in this article shall be deemed to prohibit the inclusion in the plan of conversion of provisions under which the insurer’s officers, directors, employees, agents, and employee benefit plans for their benefit may be entitled, in accordance with reasonable classifications of those individuals and employee benefit plans as may be included in the plan, to purchase for cash, at the same price as offered to the public in the initial public offering, voting stock not purchased by subscribers upon exercise of subscription rights. Nothing in this code shall be deemed to prohibit the establishment of stock option, incentive, and share ownership plans customary for publicly traded companies in the same and similar industries. The plan may not permit those persons to acquire any of the following:

(a) Greater than 25 percent of the voting stock issued pursuant to the plan for a domestic reciprocal insurer having assets in excess of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) or 35 percent for a domestic reciprocal insurer having assets of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) or less.

(b) Greater than 25 percent of the stockholders’ equity for a medical malpractice reciprocal insurer having assets in excess of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) or 35 percent for a medical malpractice reciprocal insurer having assets of less than two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000).

(c) Unexercised options that exceed 20 percent of the number of issued and outstanding shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.08.

No director, officer, agent, or employee of the domestic reciprocal insurer shall receive any fee, commission, or other valuable consideration whatsoever, other than regular salary and compensation, for in any manner aiding, promoting, or assisting in the conversion except as set forth in the plan approved by the commissioner. This provision shall not be deemed to prohibit the payment of reasonable fees and compensation to attorneys at law, accountants, and actuaries for services performed in the independent practice of their professions, even though they may also be directors of the domestic reciprocal insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.09.

At any time before that plan of conversion becomes effective, the domestic reciprocal company may, by resolution of at least two-thirds of the governing board, amend the plan of conversion or withdraw the plan of conversion. Any plan amendment shall require the written consent of the commissioner. For a plan amendment, all references in this article to the plan of conversion shall be deemed to refer to the plan as amended, but no amendment shall be deemed to change the adoption date of the plan of conversion. No amendment may change the plan of conversion in a manner that the commissioner determines is materially disadvantageous to policyholders of the insurer or members of the reciprocal holding company, unless a further public hearing is held on the plan as amended, if the amendment is made after the initial public hearing, or if the plan as amended is submitted for reconsideration by the subscribers if the amendment is made after the plan has been approved by the subscribers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.10.

Upon consent by the commissioner to the plan of conversion of a domestic reciprocal insurer and filing of the plan of conversion in accordance with the provisions of this article, the commissioner shall issue a new certificate of authority to the converted insurer. Upon issuance of the certificate of authority to a domestic reciprocal insurer and subject to subdivision (a) of Section 110 of the Corporations Code, the Secretary of State shall accept for filing the articles of incorporation of the reciprocal holding company, the stock holding company, and the converted insurer. The plan is effective upon the filing of the articles of incorporation or the certificate of amendment of the articles of incorporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.11.

(a) Upon the effective date of a plan of conversion in accordance with Section 1560.10, the domestic reciprocal insurer immediately becomes a stock corporation, the interests and rights in surplus of its subscribers are extinguished, the subscribers of the insurer immediately become members of the reciprocal holding company, and are granted rights in surplus in the reciprocal holding company equivalent to those rights in surplus previously held in the converted company, all of the voting stock initially issued by the converted insurer is owned by the stock holding company, and all of the voting stock initially issued by the stock holding company is owned by the reciprocal holding company. Except for the subscribership interests in the reciprocal insurer, which becomes membership interests in the reciprocal holding company, nothing herein is intended to, nor shall eliminate, curtail or otherwise diminish the contract rights of policyholders of a converted company. The stock holding company may thereafter, subject to compliance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1, issue securities to other persons. After the effective date, owners of policies that are issued by a stock insurer that has been converted from a domestic reciprocal insurer pursuant to proceedings under this article shall become members of the reciprocal holding company immediately upon issuance of the policies, except that an owner solely of a reporting endorsement to a claims-made policy shall not be members of the reciprocal holding company.

(b) The converted insurer shall be a continuation of the original reciprocal insurer, and the conversion shall in no way annul, modify, or change any of the original reciprocal insurer’s existing suits, rights, contracts, or liabilities except as provided in the approved plan. The converted insurer shall exercise all the rights and powers and perform all the duties conferred or imposed by law upon insurers writing the classes of insurance written by it, and shall retain the rights and contracts existing prior to conversion subject to the effect of the plan.

(c) From the effective date, the reciprocal holding company shall hold at least 51 percent of the issued and outstanding voting stock of the stock holding company and the stock holding company thereafter shall at all times hold all of the issued and outstanding voting stock of the converted insurer. The stock holding company may issue additional voting stock to the reciprocal holding company and, in addition, to other persons an amount of voting stock and securities convertible into voting stock, if in the aggregate, the issued and outstanding voting stock of the stock holding company held by the reciprocal holding company is not less than 51 percent of the issued and outstanding voting stock of the stock holding company. For purposes of the 51 percent limitation, any issued and outstanding securities of the stock holding company that are convertible into voting stock are considered issued and outstanding voting stock, provided that securities having voting power only because of the occurrence of a contingency shall not be considered securities convertible into voting stock where the contingency has not occurred.

From the effective date, the reciprocal holding company’s equity interest in the stock holding company shall not be less than 51 percent of the total stockholders’ equity in the stock holding company. For purposes of the 51 percent limitation, any issued and outstanding securities of the stock holding company that are convertible into equity securities, whether voting or nonvoting, shall be considered stockholders’ equity. Debt securities that include a default contingency conversion interest shall not be considered stockholders’ equity for compliance with the foregoing limitation.

(d) The commissioner shall retain jurisdiction over the reciprocal holding company organized pursuant to this article. Except as provided in this code, a reciprocal holding company is subject to the provisions of the General Corporation Law in like manner with other corporations. However, provisions of that law referring to shareholders or subscribers shall be applied as though those provisions referred to the members of a reciprocal holding company. For purposes of Section 1215.5, the reciprocal holding company shall be considered as if it were an insurance company. The commissioner shall retain jurisdiction over the issuance of debt securities in accordance with the protections provided in Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1.

(e) If any proceedings under Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010), Article 14.3 (commencing with Section 1064.1), Article 14.5 (commencing with Section 1065.1), or Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 1077), of Chapter 1, are brought naming as a party a stock insurer created as a result of proceedings authorized by this article, the reciprocal holding company formed as part of the conversion automatically becomes a party to the proceedings. All of the assets of the reciprocal holding company, including, but not limited to, its interest in the stock holding company formed pursuant to this article, are deemed assets of the estate of this stock insurer to the extent necessary to satisfy claims of persons against the stock insurer who have claims falling within the priorities established in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 1033. Claims of persons in their capacity as members of the reciprocal holding company shall be claims falling within the priority established in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 1033. A reciprocal holding company may not dissolve, liquidate, or wind up and dissolve without the prior written approval of the commissioner or the court pursuant to proceedings brought pursuant to Article 15 (commencing with Section 1070) of Chapter 1.

(f) With respect to the management, records, and affairs of a reciprocal holding company and except as otherwise provided in this article, a member of a reciprocal holding company has the same character of rights and relationship as a stockholder has toward a domestic stock life insurer subject to the provisions of this code.

(g) Each member of a reciprocal holding company is entitled to one vote on each matter coming to a vote at any meeting of members, regardless of the number of policies that the member holds.

(h) Notice of all meetings of members of a reciprocal holding company, whether annual or special, shall be given in writing to the members entitled to vote. The notice shall be given by the secretary, assistant secretary, or other persons charged with that duty. If there is no officer so charged, or if he or she neglects or refuses this duty, notice may be given by any director. At the option of the converted insurer, the notice may be imprinted on premium notices or receipts or on both. A notice may be given to any member either personally, or by mail, or other means of written communication, charges prepaid, addressed to the member at his or her address appearing on the books of the insurer, or given by the member to the converted insurer for the purpose of notice. If a member gives no address, and if there is no address on the books of the insurer, notice shall be deemed to have been given the member if sent by mail or other means of written communication addressed to the place where the principal office of the converted insurer is situated, or if published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the office is located and in the newspaper that has the largest daily circulation in this state. Notice of any meeting of members shall be sent to each member entitled to notice not less than 14 days before a meeting. Notice of any meeting of members shall specify the place, the day, and the hour of the meeting and the general nature of the business to be transacted.

For any member who gives no address and has no address on the books of the insurer, notice of an annual meeting to be held at the time and place specified is deemed adequate if published at least once in each of four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office of the converted insurer is located and in the newspaper that has the largest daily circulation in this state. If the notice is so published, no other notice of the meeting is required.

(i) The presence in person or by proxy of 5 percent of the members of a reciprocal holding company entitled to vote at any meeting constitutes a quorum for the transaction of all business of the reciprocal holding company, including, but not limited to, the amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the reciprocal holding company.

(j) Any required member approval shall be by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members who vote, or a higher percentage of the members as may be required by law or the articles of incorporation, a quorum being present.

(k) The governing body of the reciprocal holding company shall be comprised of not less than 6 nor more than 18 directors. A majority of the reciprocal holding company directors shall be policyholders of the converted insurer. Unless the plan provides that at least a majority of the directors of the boards of the stock holding company and the converted insurer are also directors of the reciprocal holding company, the commissioner shall determine whether the proposed composition of the boards of directors of each of the constituent corporations of the reciprocal holding company system, as provided in the articles of incorporation and bylaws, facilitate the control of the converted insurer by the reciprocal holding company. No term shall continue longer than six years. In the absence of such provisions, each director shall be elected for a term of one year. All directors shall hold office for the term for which they are elected and until their successors are elected and qualified. The bylaws of the reciprocal holding company shall set forth a procedure for establishing reciprocal holding company independent directors in the event that the stock holding company issues securities. Not less than one of every six directors of the reciprocal holding company shall be so designated. A director may, but need not, be a member of the reciprocal holding company of which he or she is acting as director. Vacancies in the board of directors may be filled by a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum. Each director so elected shall hold office until the next annual meeting.

(l) Member interests in a reciprocal holding company are exempt from Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1. A description of the member interests and related factual disclosure shall not be considered to be an inducement to buy insurance in violation of Section 10430. Any promise of returns, profits, or distributions, or representations with regard to the benefits of membership, made as an inducement in connection with the issuance and delivery of a policy is subject to Section 10430 and the remedy provided in Section 10433.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.12.

(a) Prior to, and for a period of five years following, the effective date of the plan of conversion, no person or group of persons acting in concert shall directly or indirectly offer to acquire or acquire in any manner the beneficial ownership of 5 percent or more of any class of voting securities of a converted insurer or of a person that controls, as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 1215, the converted insurer, without the prior consent of the commissioner. Any application for that approval shall contain information as the commissioner may require and shall be accompanied by a filing fee in an amount equal to the filing fee specified in Section 1215.2.

(b) In the event of any violation of this section, or of any
 action that, if consummated, would constitute a violation, all voting securities of the converted insurer or of the person acquired by any person in excess of the maximum amount permitted to be acquired by the person pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed to be nonvoting securities of the converted insurer or of that person. The violation or action may be enforced or enjoined by an appropriate proceeding commenced by the converted insurer, a person, the commissioner, any policyholder or stockholder of the converted insurer, or the person on behalf of the converted insurer or the person in the superior court in the judicial district in which the converted insurer has its home office or in any other court having jurisdiction. The court may issue any order it finds necessary to cure the violation or to prevent the proposed action. In addition to the foregoing, whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has committed a violation of this section, the commissioner may proceed as provided in
 Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 to take possession of the property of the converted insurer and to conduct the business thereof.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “beneficial ownership,” with respect to voting securities, means the sole or shared power to vote, or direct the voting of, voting securities or the sole or shared power to dispose, or direct the disposition, of voting securities.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “voting security” includes voting stock as defined in Section 1560.02, any preorganization certificate or subscription, including subscription rights issued pursuant to a plan of conversion, or any security convertible, with or without consideration, into voting security, or carrying any warrant or right to subscribe for, or purchase any, voting security, or any such warrant or right. 

(e) For the purposes of this section, “offer” includes an offer to buy or acquire, solicitation of an offer to sell, tender offer for, or request or invitation for tenders of a security or interest in a security for value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 10.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.13.

Unless otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, the governing body and officers of the domestic reciprocal insurer shall serve as directors and officers of the converted insurer until new directors and officers have been duly elected and qualified pursuant to the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the stock company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.14.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), actions concerning any plan of conversion, proposed plan of conversion, plan amendment, or proposed plan amendment under this article or any acts taken or proposed to be taken under this article shall be commenced within one year after the plan of conversion or plan amendment is filed in the office of the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1560.03 or Section 1560.10, or six months from the effective date of the plan of conversion, whichever is later. If the plan of conversion is withdrawn, the actions or acts shall be commenced within six months from the date the governing body approves a resolution to withdraw the plan. If an action concerns or arises out of a plan amendment or proposed plan amendment made under Section 1560.09, the applicable time period is measured from the filing, effective date, or approval of withdrawal of the plan amendment, whichever is later.

(b) Judicial review of any act of the commissioner or any other governmental body or officer concerning or arising out of any plan of conversion, proposed plan of conversion, plan amendment, or proposed plan amendment under this article may only be had by filing a petition for a writ of mandate within 30 days of the date of the act. However, any petition seeking judicial review shall be filed no later than 30 days from the effective date of the plan of conversion or plan amendment, whichever is the subject of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.15.

The offer or sale of securities issued pursuant to the plan of conversion developed and approved in accordance with the provisions of this article, shall be exempt from Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.16.

The commissioner shall have the authority from time to time, to make, amend, and rescind any rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this article. The commissioner shall also have the authority to charge and collect from the insurer for the actual amount of expenses reasonably incurred by the state in discharge of the commissioner’s duties hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.17.

Upon completion of the act of conversion and issuance of the certificate of authority under Section 1560.10, the Secretary of State shall accept for filing a verified copy of the articles of incorporation of the converted insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.18.

(a) The articles of incorporation of a converted insurer that have been adopted pursuant to a plan of conversion and filed with the Secretary of State in accordance with Section 1560.10 may be further amended after the effective date pursuant to applicable law. The plan of conversion may be amended in other respects after the effective date of the plan as specified in this section. An amendment of the plan of conversion shall take effect upon filing with the Secretary of State after compliance with the following:

(1) Approval by a resolution of at least two-thirds of the board of directors of the converted insurer. The resolution shall specify the reasons for and the purposes of the proposed amendment.

(2) Submission to the commissioner for consent in writing, subject to the provisions of Section 1560.05.

(3) Approval by at least two-thirds of those members of the corporation who were subscribers of the converting insurer and entitled to vote on the original plan of conversion approved pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1560.03 and who vote at a meeting called for that purpose.

(4) Filed in the office of the commissioner after having been consented to and approved as contemplated by paragraphs (2) and (3).

(b) If an amendment proposed under subdivision (a) would adversely affect the rights of one or more classes of subscribers, but not all of those subscribers, then only the subscribers of each class whose rights would be adversely affected by the proposed amendment are entitled to vote on the proposed plan amendment.

(c) A subscriber meeting prescribed by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be called by the board of directors, the chairperson of the board, or the president of the converted insurer. Notice of the meeting shall be given to subscribers entitled to vote at the meeting by mail at least 45 days prior to the date set for the meeting. Voting shall be by ballot, in person, or by proxy. A quorum consists of 10 percent of the subscribers of the converted insurer entitled to vote at the meeting.

(d) At any time before the plan amendment becomes effective, the converted insurer may, by resolution of at least two-thirds of the board of directors, amend the plan amendment or withdraw its plan amendment. For an amendment to a plan amendment, all references in this section to the plan amendment shall be deemed to refer to the plan amendment as amended. Any amendment of the plan amendment shall require the written consent of the commissioner. No amendment shall be deemed to change the date of adoption of the plan amendment. No amendment made after approval by the subscribers as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) may change the plan amendment in a manner that the commissioner determines is materially disadvantageous to any of the affected subscribers unless the plan amendment as amended is submitted for reconsideration under the procedures prescribed for the original plan amendment, subscriber approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.19.

If the name of a domestic reciprocal insurer converting to a stock insurer pursuant to this article includes the word “reciprocal,” the new stock insurer may continue to use the word “reciprocal” in its name if the name includes a word or words that identify the new stock insurer as a stock insurer and the commissioner finds that the continued use of the word “reciprocal” in its name is not likely to mislead or deceive the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Foreign Insurers [1561. - 1620.7.]



  ARTICLE 1. Conditions of Doing Business [1561. - 1561.]

1561.

Any law or ruling of any state of the United States or any foreign country which shall attempt to assume jurisdiction over, or to authorize regulation or supervision of, a noninsurance affiliate of a domestic insurer, where such attempt is based solely upon the domestic insurer applying for or holding a certificate of authority to do business in such state or foreign country, whether such attempt be by registration or through disclosure, reports, examinations, or other devices imposed on either the insurer or its noninsurance affiliate, directly or indirectly, shall be deemed to be an unreasonable law. Upon finding that such unreasonable law has been applied to a domestic insurer or its noninsurance affiliate by such state or foreign country, the commissioner may refuse to grant an initial certificate of authority, but not a renewal of an existing certificate of authority, to an insurer organized under the laws of such state or foreign country thereafter applying to him for authority to do business in this state.

As used in this section, “affiliate” means a person that, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, the domestic insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Alien Insurers [1580. - 1599.]

1580.

As used in this article, the term “alien insurer” means a foreign insurer organized under the laws of any jurisdiction other than a State of the United States.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

1581.

Except as otherwise expressly provided for particular insurers, an alien insurer shall not transact any insurance in this State without first making the deposit required by this article nor, subject to the exception specified in Section 1582, without first complying with all other provisions of this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

1582.

The amount of such deposit shall be equal to the minimum amount of the paid-in capital required for admission of incorporated insurers issuing policies on a reserve basis and transacting the same classes of insurance which such alien insurer is transacting in the United States, but the commissioner may accept such deposit in excess of such amount. Such deposit may be treated as a part of the assets of the depositing insurer. For the purpose of computing the amount of the deposit, the value of the securities shall not be estimated in excess of the par value nor of the market value thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 542.)
-------------------------------------------

1583.

The deposit required by Section 1581

(a) Shall be continuously maintained so long as any obligation arising out of any insurance transacted by such alien insurer in the United States remains in existence for any purpose whatever;

(b) Shall consist of securities authorized for investment of the assets of domestic incorporated insurers;

(c) Shall be in addition to any deposits required by law for purposes other than those specified in Section 1586;

(d) May be made with the insurance authority, or with the auditor, controller or general fiscal officer of any State of the United States in which such alien insurer is authorized to transact insurance, or otherwise held in trust as provided by the laws of the State of deposit, for the purposes specified in Section 1586.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

1585.

If such deposit is not so maintained in this State, it shall be deemed to be in existence as required by this article only when a certificate, issued by the proper authority of the State of deposit and showing in detail the constituent securities thereof and the purpose thereof, is delivered to the commissioner at least annually and at such other times as may be required by the commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

1586.

Such deposit, if maintained in this State, shall be for the benefit and security of all the policyholders and creditors of such alien insurer in the United States, and if maintained in another State, for the benefit and security of all the policyholders, or of all the policyholders and creditors, of such alien insurer in the United States.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

1587.

Securities deposited with the commissioner pursuant to this article shall be specially deposited by him in the State Treasury, in packages marked with the name of the insurer from whom the securities were received.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

1588.

As long as the depositing insurer is solvent and the deposited securities are sufficient under this article, it may collect the income on the deposited securities. From time to time it may withdraw such securities if it deposits other securities, of the character and value specified in this article in the stead of those to be withdrawn, but deposited securities shall not be withdrawn from the State Treasury except upon the written order of the depositing insurer, indorsed by the commissioner or, if such indorsement is refused, under the authority of some court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

1589.

Whenever a deposit is made with the commissioner, he or she shall issue to the depositing insurer a certificate under his or her official seal stating the items and amount of securities so deposited, and their value, to the best of his or her knowledge. In case of withdrawal and substitution, he or she shall issue a supplemental certificate of similar nature.

The commissioner shall require the payment of seventy-two dollars ($72), in advance, as a fee for issuing the first certificate provided for in this article to each insurer, and twenty-five dollars ($25) for each additional certificate or each supplemental certificate evidencing any withdrawal, substitution, or other change in the securities deposited. There shall be no other or additional fee for attaching the
 commissioner’s seal to a securities deposit schedule in those instances. The fees prescribed herein are separate from and not cumulative upon those prescribed by Article 11 (commencing with Section 939), Chapter 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 31.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1590.

The commissioner shall require the payment of forty-four dollars ($44), in advance, as a fee for filing a certificate of deposit of securities under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 32.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1591.

In addition to complying with all other applicable requirements of this code, every admitted alien insurer shall on or before the first day of March in each year after the year 1941, file with the commissioner a statement on a form prescribed by him, showing as of the 31st day of December then next preceding, the following information:

(a) All of its assets within the United States on deposit with officers of any state thereof for the benefit and security of all the policyholders, or of all the policyholders and creditors, of such alien insurer within the United States. Such assets so deposited are designated “general state deposits.”

(b) All of its assets within the United States, other than general state deposits, on deposit with officers of any state thereof for the benefit and security of all the policyholders, or policyholders and creditors, of such alien insurer within the state of deposit or of certain classes of policyholders, or policyholders and creditors, either within the state of deposit or within the United States. Such assets so deposited are designated “special state deposits.” The value to be allowed in such statement for any special state deposit shall not exceed the liability secured thereby.

(c) All of its assets within the United States, other than general state deposits and special state deposits, held by any trustee for the benefit and security of all the policyholders or of all the policyholders and creditors, of such alien insurer within the United States. Such assets so held are designated “trusteed assets.”

(d) The amount of interest receivable, accrued at the date of such statement on the general state deposits, the special state deposits, and the trusteed assets of such alien insurer, if such interest is collectible by the State or trustee.

(e) All of the reserves and other liabilities arising out of policies or obligations issued, assumed or incurred by such alien insurer in the United States. Said reserves and other liabilities are designated as “liabilities in the United States.”

For the purpose of determining the liabilities in the United States of such alien insurer there may be deducted:

(1) From the amount of such liabilities for unpaid losses, the amount, included therein, of reinsurance recoverable thereon from insurers authorized to do business in any state of the United States, subject to the same limitations as are contained in Sections 922.2 to 922.4, inclusive, and in Sections 922.6 and 922.8.

(2) From the amount of such liabilities for unearned premiums, first, the unearned portion, included in such amount, of premiums receivable by such alien insurer from its agents or policyholders under policies issued by it in the United States and not more than 90 days past due on the date of such statement, and second, subject to the same limitations as are contained in Section 922.4, the unearned portion, included in such amount of reinsurance premiums receivable by such alien insurer from other insurers authorized to do business in any state of the United States.

(3) The ratable portion, included in such liabilities, of the gross liabilities and reserves on risks reinsured, in whole or in part, by an alien insurer which complies with this article and includes in the statements required thereby all reserves and liabilities arising out of such reinsurance, or, subject to the same limitations as are contained in Sections 922.2 to 922.8, inclusive, by another insurer which is authorized to transact insurance in any state of the United States, except in the case of excess loss and catastrophe reinsurance where the deduction shall be on the basis of the actual reinsurance premiums and the actual reinsurance terms.

(4) Those liabilities in the United States, pertaining to any asset in the United States of such alien insurer, other than the assets described in subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), but such deduction shall in no case exceed that portion of the value of such asset which is applicable to the liability pertaining thereto.

(5) If such alien insurer is a life insurer, the amount of the unpaid principal and interest of any loan made by it to the holder of, and solely on the security of, any policy of life insurance or annuity contract issued or assumed by it, on the life of or to any person in the United States. Such amount shall in no case exceed the amount of the reserve required to be maintained on such policy or annuity contract by such insurer. Such amount is designated as “policy loans in the United States.”

(f) Such further information required by the commissioner, as he deems necessary to apply the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 271.)
-------------------------------------------

1592.

The statement required by Section 1591 shall be verified in the manner prescribed in Sections 903 and 903.5 and the certificate of each trustee in the United States holding trusteed assets of the alien insurer shall be filed, showing the description and amount of the trusteed assets and the purpose for which they are held. The statement shall be filed in quadruplicate by the alien insurer with the office of the department in Los Angeles. Upon receipt of the four copies, the commissioner shall ensure that one copy is maintained at the department’s office in Los Angeles, one copy at the department’s office in the San Francisco Bay area, and one copy at the department’s office in Sacramento.

The commissioner may at other times require an admitted alien insurer to file
 similar statements, showing the information specified in Section 1591 with respect to another date prescribed by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 6.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1593.

The excess of the sum of those items in such statement, which are described in subdivision (a), (b), (c) and (d) of Section 1591, over the liabilities in the United States of such alien insurer is designated the “trusteed surplus in the United States” of such alien insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

1594.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that the trusteed surplus in the United States of an alien insurer is less than an amount equal to the minimum amount of the capital paid in or available cash assets required by this code for the classes of insurance transacted by such alien insurer in the United States, he shall determine the amount of such deficiency and make requisition upon such alien insurer in writing, addressed to its attorney in the United States or to its United States manager, to repair such deficiency within such time, not less than 60 nor more than 90 days from the service of such requisition, as he may therein designate. The commissioner may revoke or suspend the certificate of authority of such alien insurer or order it to cease issuing new policies in the United States, while such deficiency exists.
